District of Columbia statutes.
47-2888.07

Penalties.

(a)

Any person who violates any provision of this part, or rules promulgated pursuant to this part, that results in physical harm to an animal shall be subject to a fine for each offense of not more than $10,000, imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or both. Each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense, and the penalties prescribed herein shall apply to each offense; provided, that the total fine shall not exceed $100,000 and the aggregate imprisonment term shall not exceed 6 months.

(b)

Any person who intentionally impedes a District employee in the performance of his or her official duties shall be subject to a fine for each offense of not more than $1,000, imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or both.

(c)

Any person who knowingly notifies a licensee or employee of a licensee, directly or indirectly, that an unannounced inspection will occur shall be subject to a fine of not more than $5,000, imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or both.

(d)

Prosecutions for violations of this part shall be brought in the name of the District of Columbia in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia by the Office of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia.

(e)

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this part pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this part shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801 et seq.].

March 26, 2014, D.C. Law 20-96, § 302(b), 61 DCR 1184